District of Columbia statutes.
29A-221.22

Repealed

Trial; decree of forfeiture; appointment of receiver.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1319, ch. 854, § 789
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-221.22.
1981 Ed., § 29-422.
1973 Ed., § 29-722.